California, session 20252026, SB1101.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66018.6 is added to the Education Code, to read:66018.6. (a) (1) The Trustees of the California State University, the governing board of a community college district, and an independent institution of higher education that is a qualifying institution as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7, shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, notify faculty, staff, and students if their personal information is shared with the United States Department of Education’s Office for Civil Rights when the request for personal information is made as part of an investigative, compliance, or enforcement action.(2) For requests for personal information of faculty, staff, or students made by a subpoena, notification made pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be made as soon as reasonably practicable before complying with the subpoena.(b) Notification made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include a description of the specific types of personal information shared, including, but not limited to, telephone numbers, email addresses, and physical addresses.(c) The Trustees of the California State University, the governing board of a community college district, and an independent institution of higher education that is a qualifying institution as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7, shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, only share personal information of faculty, staff, and students with the United States Department of Education’s Office for Civil Rights if that sharing of personal information is required by federal or state law.(d) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.(e) For purposes of this section, “personal information” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 1798.140 of the Civil Code.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.